Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.090

Fluency in English required.

Before licensure, each applicant shall demonstrate sufficient fluency in reading, speaking, and understanding the English language to enable the applicant to communicate with other health care providers and patients concerning health care problems and treatment.

[ 1995 c 323 s 8; 1985 c 326 s 9.]